Utah statutes.
41-6a-519.   Municipal attorneys for specified offenses may prosecute for certain DUI offenses and driving while license is suspended or revoked.

The following class A misdemeanors may be prosecuted by attorneys of cities and towns and other prosecutors authorized elsewhere in this code to prosecute these alleged violations:

(1)  alleged class A misdemeanor violations of Section 41-6a-502; and

(2)  alleged violations of Section 53-3-227, which consist of the person operating a vehicle while the person's driving privilege is suspended or revoked for:

(a)  a violation of Section 41-6a-502;

(b)  a local ordinance which complies with the requirements of Section 41-6a-510, 41-6a-520, or 76-5-207; or

(c)  a criminal prohibition that the person was charged with violating as a result of a plea bargain after having been originally charged with violating one or more of the sections or ordinances identified in Subsection (2)(a) or (b).

